Washington statutes.
RCW 18.310.070

Background investigations.

Background investigations under this chapter consist of fingerprint-based background checks through the Washington state patrol criminal identification system and through the federal bureau of investigation. The applicant is required to pay the current federal and state fees for fingerprint-based criminal history background checks. The applicant shall submit the fingerprints and required fees for the background checks to the department for submission to the Washington state patrol.

[ 2010 c 179 s 15.]